Utah, session 2026, HB512.
Section 1. Section 57-10-1 is amended to read:57-10-1. Plane coordinate systems designated.(1)The systems of plane coordinates that have been established by the National Ocean Service/National Geodetic Survey (formerly the United States Coast and Geodetic Survey) or its successors for defining and stating the geographic positions or locations of points on the surface of the earth within the state of Utah are known and designated as the Utah Coordinate System of 1927 and the Utah Coordinate System of 1983.(2)For the purpose of the use of these systems, the state is divided into three zones: North, Central, and South Zones.(a)The area now included in the following counties constitutes the North Zone: Box Elder, Cache, Daggett, Davis, Morgan, Rich, Summit, and Weber.(b)The area now included in the following counties constitutes the Central Zone: Carbon, Duchesne, Emery, Grand, Juab, Millard, Salt Lake, Sanpete, Sevier, Tooele, Uintah, Utah, and Wasatch.(c)The area now included in the following counties constitutes the South Zone: Beaver, Garfield, Iron, Kane, Piute, San Juan, Washington, and Wayne.(1)As used in this chapter:(a)"FGCC" means the Federal Geodetic Control Committee of the United States Department of Commerce.(b)"NGS" means the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration's National Geodetic Survey.(2)(a)For purposes of defining and stating the geographic position or location of points on the surface of the earth within the state, the state adopts the plane coordinate systems that the NGS establishes.(b)The systems described in (2)(a) are known as the "Utah Plane Coordinate System."(3)The state adopts the 2022 State Plane Coordinate System for use within the state.(4)References in existing records to the Utah Coordinate System of 1927, or the Utah Coordinate System of 1983, remain valid.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 57-10-2 is amended to read:57-10-2. Zones.(1)As established for use in the North Zone, the Utah Coordinate System of 1927 or the Utah Coordinate System of 1983 shall be named and designated as the "Utah Coordinate System 1927 North Zone" or "Utah Coordinate System 1983 North Zone" in any land description or on any map or document in which it is used.(2)As established for use in the Central Zone, the Utah Coordinate System of 1927 or the Utah Coordinate System of 1983 shall be named and designated as the "Utah Coordinate System 1927 Central Zone" or "Utah Coordinate System 1983 Central Zone" in any land description or on any map or document in which it is used.(3)As established for use in the South Zone, the Utah Coordinate System of 1927 or the Utah Coordinate System of 1983 shall be named and designated as the "Utah Coordinate System 1927 South Zone" or "Utah Coordinate System 1983 South Zone" in any land description or on any map or document in which it is used.(1)The Utah Plane Coordinate System is divided into zones that the NGS defines for the state.(2)All previously designated coordinate systems, including associated zones and definitions, remain unchanged.

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 57-10-3 is amended to read:57-10-3. North-south and east-west coordinate values.The plane coordinate values for a point on the earth's surface used to express the geographic position or location or point in the appropriate zone of this system shall consist of two distances expressed in U.S. survey feet and decimals of a foot when using the Utah Coordinate System of 1927 and expressed in meters and decimals of a meter when using the Utah Coordinate System of 1983.(1)One of these distances, known as the "x-coordinate" or "E-coordinate," shall give the position in an east-west direction; the other, known as the "y-coordinate" or "N-coordinate," shall give the position in a north-south direction.(2)These coordinates shall be made to depend upon and conform to plane rectangular coordinate values computed on the systems defined in this chapter for the monumented points of the North American Horizontal Geodetic Control Network, as published by the National Ocean Service/National Geodetic Survey (formerly the United States Coast and Geodetic Survey) or its successors.(3)Any such station may be used for establishing a survey connection to either Utah coordinate system.(1)A person who uses plane coordinate values to express the geographic position or location of a point within a zone of the Utah Plane Coordinate System shall express the values in the units established for the Utah Plane Coordinate System.(2)The coordinate values described in Subsection (1) consist of:(a)an "x-coordinate" or "E-coordinate" that expresses position in an east-west direction; and(b)a "y-coordinate" or "N-coordinate" that expresses position in a north-south direction.(3)A person shall compute the coordinates so that the coordinates depend on and conform to plane rectangular coordinate values computed for monumented points of the North American Horizontal Geodetic Control Network that the NGS publishes.(4)A person may use a control station described in Subsection (3) to establish a survey connection to land descriptions prepared using the Utah Plane Coordinate System after June 30, 2026, in accordance with the NGS's deprecation of former systems.(5)A person may use units other than the units described in Subsection (1) if the person clearly identifies the deviation in the survey record or land description.

Section 4:
Section 4. Section 57-10-4 is amended to read:57-10-4. Legal effect of descriptions using coordinate values.(1)A description of the location of any survey station or land boundary corner in the state is complete, legal, and satisfactory if it is expressed by use of the system of plane coordinates defined in this chapter.(2)For purposes of sale or title transfer, no real property may be described solely by reference to coordinate values from the Utah coordinate system or any other coordinate system.(3)When coordinates based on the Utah coordinate system are used in the description of any tract of land, they are supplemental to the basic description relating to existing recognized monuments and land lines of record.(4)The description by reference to the subdivision, line, or corner of the United States public land surveys prevails over the description by coordinates, if there is any conflict between the descriptions.(1)A description of the location of a survey station or land boundary corner within the state is complete, legal, and sufficient if the description uses the Utah Plane Coordinate System.(2)A person may not describe real property for purposes of sale or title transfer solely by reference to coordinate values from the Utah Plane Coordinate System or any other coordinate system.(3)If a person uses coordinates from the Utah Plane Coordinate System in a land description, the coordinates supplement the underlying description that relates to recognized monuments and land lines of record.(4)If a conflict exists between a description that references a subdivision, line, or corner of the United States public land surveys and a description that uses coordinates, the description that references the subdivision, line, or corner of the United States public land surveys prevail.

Section 5:
Section 5. Section 57-10-5 is amended to read:57-10-5. Descriptions of tracts extending over more than one zone.(1)When any tract of land that is to be defined by a single land description extends from one into another of the coordinate zones, the positions of all points on its boundaries may be referred to by either of the two zones.(2)The zone that is used shall be identified specifically in the land description.(1)If a single land description defines a tract of land that extends from one coordinate zone into another coordinate zone, a person may refer the positions of boundary points to either zone.(2)When using a coordinate, a person shall identify in the land description which coordinate zone the person uses.

Section 6:
Section 6. Section 57-10-6 is amended to read:57-10-6. Reference materials defining coordinate systems.For purposes of more precisely defining the Utah Coordinate Systems, the following special publications are adopted:(1)For the Utah Coordinate System of 1927, the manual entitled "The State Coordinate Systems (A Manual for Surveyors)," Special Publication No. 235, and "Plane Coordinate Projection Tables for Utah," Special Publication No. 277.  Both manuals are published by the U.S. Department of Commerce, Coast and Geodetic Survey, and provide, in part, the following:(a)(i)The "Utah Coordinate System of 1927 North Zone" is a Lambert Conformal Conic Projection of the Clarke Spheroid of 1866 having standard parallels at north latitudes 41 degrees 47 minutes and 40 degrees 43 minutes, along which parallels the scale shall be exact.(ii)The origin of coordinates is at the intersection of the meridian 111 degrees 30 minutes west of Greenwich and the parallel 40 degrees 20 minutes north latitude.(iii)This origin is given the coordinates: x=2,000,000 feet and y=0 feet.(b)(i)The "Utah Coordinate System of 1927 Central Zone" is a Lambert Conformal Conic Projection of the Clarke Spheroid of 1866 having standard parallels at north latitudes 40 degrees 39 minutes and 39 degrees 01 minutes, along which parallels the scale shall be exact.(ii)The origin of coordinates is at the intersection of the meridian 111 degrees 30 minutes west of Greenwich and the parallel 38 degrees 20 minutes north latitude.(iii)This origin is given the coordinates: x=2,000,000 feet and y=0 feet.(c)(i)The "Utah Coordinate System of 1927 South Zone" is a Lambert Conformal Conic Projection of the Clarke Spheroid of 1866 having standard parallels at north latitudes 38 degrees 21 minutes and 37 degrees 13 minutes, along which parallels the scale shall be exact.(ii)The origin of coordinates is at the intersection of the meridian 111 degrees 30 minutes west of Greenwich and the parallel 36 degrees 40 minutes north latitude.(iii)This origin is given the coordinates: x=2,000,000 feet and y=0 feet.(2)For the Utah Coordinate System of 1983, the manual entitled "State Plan Coordinate System of 1983," NOAA Manual NOS NGS 5.  The manual is published by the U.S. Department of Commerce, National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration, and provides, in part, the following:(a)(i)The "Utah Coordinate System of 1983 North Zone" is a Lambert Conformal Conic Projection of the North American Datum of 1983 having standard parallels at north latitudes 41 degrees 47 minutes and 40 degrees 43 minutes, along which parallels the scale shall be exact.(ii)The origin of coordinates is at the intersection of the meridian 111 degrees 30 minutes west of Greenwich and the parallel 40 degrees 20 minutes north latitude.(iii)This origin is given the coordinates: x or E=500,000 meters and y or N=1,000,000 meters.(b)(i)The "Utah Coordinate System of 1983 Central Zone" is a Lambert Conformal Conic Projection of the North American Datum of 1983 having standard parallels at north latitudes 40 degrees 39 minutes and 39 degrees 01 minutes, along which parallels the scale shall be exact.(ii)The origin of coordinates is at the intersection of the meridian 111 degrees 30 minutes west Greenwich and the parallel 38 degrees 20 minutes north latitude.(iii)This origin is given the coordinates: x or E=500,000 meters and y or N=2,000,000 meters.(c)(i)The "Utah Coordinate System of 1983 South Zone" is a Lambert Conformal Conic Projection of the North American Datum of 1983 having standard parallels at north latitudes 38 degrees 21 minutes and 37 degrees 13 minutes, along which parallels the scale shall be exact.(ii)The origin of coordinates is at the intersection of the meridian 111 degrees 30 minutes west of Greenwich and the parallel 36 degrees 40 minutes north latitude.(iii)This origin is given the coordinates: x or E=500,000 meters and y or N=3,000,000 meters.For purposes of defining the coordinate systems referenced in this chapter, the state adopts the reference materials that NGS publishes and maintains for the Utah Plane Coordinate System and the associated datums, projections, zones, units, and control standards.

Section 7:
Section 7. Section 57-10-7 is amended to read:57-10-7. Coordinates required to be based on control stations.(1)Coordinates based on either the Utah Coordinate System of 1927 or the Utah Coordinate System of 1983 that purport to define the position of a point on a land boundary shall be based on a monumented horizontal control station established in conformity with the standards of accuracy and specifications for first or second order geodetic surveying, as prepared and published by the Federal Geodetic Control Committee (FGCC) of the United States Department of Commerce.(a)Standards and specifications of the FGCC or its successor in force on the date of the survey shall apply.(b)Publishing existing control stations, or the acceptance with intent to publish the newly established stations, by the National Ocean Service/National Geodetic Survey constitutes evidence of adherence to the FGCC specifications.(2)Control stations which have been established by agencies of the state or its political subdivisions may also be used, provided those points are established in conformity with the standards set forth in Section 57-10-6.(1)A person who uses coordinates from the Utah Plane Coordinate System to define the position of a point on a land boundary shall base the coordinates on a monumented horizontal control station that conforms to the standards and specifications that the FGCC publishes.(2)(a)The FGCC standards and specifications that are in effect on the date of the survey apply.(b)The NGS publication of an existing control station, or the NGS acceptance of a newly established control station with intent to publish, constitutes evidence that the station conforms to the FGCC standards and specifications.(3)A person may also use a control station established by the state or a political subdivision of the state if the control station conforms to Section 57-10-6.

Section 8:
Section 8. Section 57-10-8 is amended to read:57-10-8. Use of terms on maps and documents.(1)Any document identifying or using a coordinate system shall, in accordance with Section 57-10-9, clearly and completely identify the system used.(a)The use of the term "Utah Coordinate System of 1927 (North, Central, South) Zone" on any map, report of survey, or other document shall be used to reference the system, the coordinates, and the unit of measure as defined in Subsection 57-10-6(1).(b)The use of the term "Utah Coordinate System of 1983 (HARN 1994, or the current federal coordinate update used as the basis of the system being used) (North, Central, South) Zone" shall be used to reference the system, the coordinates, and the unit of measure as defined in Subsection 57-10-6(2).(2)Anyone using a coordinate system similar to the Utah coordinate system, such as one where a modified elevation datum is used, shall clearly include "modified" in the title of the coordinate system.(3)Any survey or map based on any such modified coordinate system shall show the title of the coordinate system, including "modified" in the title and show the appropriate combined adjustment factor relating the system to the Utah coordinate system.(1)A document that identifies or uses a coordinate system shall clearly and completely identify the coordinate system used in accordance with Section 57-10-9.(2)A person who uses the term "Utah Coordinate System" on a map, report of survey, or other document shall use the term to reference the coordinate system, the coordinates, and the unit of measure.(3)A person who uses a coordinate system that is similar to the Utah Plane Coordinate System, including a system that uses a modified elevation datum, shall include the word "modified" in the title of the coordinate system.(4)A survey or map that is based on a modified coordinate system shall:(a)display the full title of the modified coordinate system, including the word "modified"; and(b)display the appropriate combined adjustment factor that relates the modified system to the Utah Plane Coordinate System.

Section 9:
Section 9. Section 57-10-9 is amended to read:57-10-9. Use of coordinate system.The use of the Utah coordinate system by any person, corporation, or governmental agency engaged in land surveying or mapping, or both, is optional.(1)A person who uses the Utah Plane Coordinate System for horizontal or vertical coordinate values shall reference the values to the most current National Spatial Reference System that the NGS maintains.(2)A person shall include metadata that describes the coordinate system used and the basis of bearings with the coordinate-based land description or survey record.(3)Nothing in this chapter prohibits a person from using another datum, reference network, or coordinate system in a survey, map, or legal description that does not use the Utah Plane Coordinate System if the person clearly identifies and documents the datum, reference network, or coordinate system used, including the basis of bearings, historical rotation, or existing monumentation.

Section 10:
Section 10. Section 58-22-302 is amended to read:58-22-302. Qualifications for licensure.(1)Each applicant for licensure as a professional engineer shall:(a)submit an application in a form prescribed by the divisionthe division approves;(b)pay a fee determined by the department underdetermines in accordance with Section 63J-1-504;(c)(i)have graduated and received a bachelors or mastersbachelor's or master's degree from an engineering program meeting criteria established by rule by the division in collaboration with the boardthe division makes by rule in collaboration with the board; or(ii)have completed the Transportation Engineering Technology and Fundamental Engineering College Program before July 1, 1998, under the direction of the Utah Department of Transportation and as certified by the Utah Department of Transportation;(d)have successfully completed a program of qualifying experience established by rule by the division in collaboration with the boardthe division makes by rule in collaboration with the board;(e)have successfully passed examinations established by rule by the division in collaboration with the boardthe division makes by rule in collaboration with the board; and(f)meet with the board or representative of the division upon request for the purpose of evaluating the applicant's qualification for licensure.(2)Each applicant for licensure as a professional structural engineer shall:(a)submit an application in a form prescribed by the divisionthe division approves;(b)pay a fee determined by the department underdetermines in accordance with Section 63J-1-504;(c)have graduated and received an earned bachelors or mastersbachelor's or master's degree from an engineering program meeting criteria established by rule by the division in collaboration with the boardthe division makes by rule in collaboration with the board;(d)have successfully completed three years of licensed professional engineering experience established by rule by the division in collaboration with the board, except that prior to January 1, 2009, an applicant for licensure may submit a signed affidavit in a form prescribed by the division stating that the applicant is currently engaged in the practice of structural engineeringthe division makes by rule in collaboration with the board;(e)have successfully passed examinations established by rule by the division in collaboration with the board, except that prior to January 1, 2009, an applicant for licensure may submit a signed affidavit in a form prescribed by the division stating that the applicant is currently engaged in the practice of structural engineeringthe division makes by rule in collaboration with the board; and(f)meet with the board or representative of the division upon request for the purpose of evaluating the applicant's qualification for licensure.(3)Each applicant for licensure as a professional land surveyor shall:(a)submit an application in a form approved by the divisionthe division approves;(b)pay a fee determined by the department underthe department determines in accordance with Section 63J-1-504;(c)(i)meet one of the following education and experience requirements:(i)hold, at a minimum, an associatesassociate degree from a land surveying program, or an equivalent land surveying program, such as a program offered by a technical college described in Section 53H-3-1202, established by rule by the division in collaboration with the board the division makes by rule in collaboration with the board, and have successfully completed a program of qualifying experience in land surveying established by rule by the division in collaboration with the boardcompleted at least six years of qualifying experience in land surveying, as the division determines by rule made in collaboration with the board; or(ii)have successfully completed a program of qualifying experience in land surveying prior to January 1, 2007, in accordance with rules established by the division in collaboration with the board;(ii)hold a bachelor's degree from a land surveying program, or an equivalent land surveying program that the division approves by rule in collaboration with the board, and have completed at least four years of qualifying experience in land surveying, as the division determines by rule in collaboration with the board;(iii)hold a high school diploma, or the equivalent of a recognized high school diploma, and have completed at least 10 years of qualifying experience in land surveying, as the division determines by rule in collaboration with the board; or(iv)hold a professional land surveying license, or equivalent license in the United States, and practice as a professional land surveyor in the United States for at least one year;(d)have successfully passed examinations established by rule by the division in collaboration with the boardthe division approves by rule in collaboration with the board; and(e)meet with the board or representative of the division upon request for the purpose of evaluating the applicant's qualification for licensure.(4)Each applicant for licensure by endorsement shall:(a)submit an application in a form approved by the divisionthe division approves;(b)pay a fee determined by the department underdetermines in accordance with Section 63J-1-504;(c)submit satisfactory evidence of:(i)current licensure in good standing in a jurisdiction recognized by rule by the division in collaboration with the boardthe division recognizes by rule in collaboration with the board;(ii)having successfully passed an examination established by rule by the division in collaboration with the boardthe division approves by rule in collaboration with the board; and(iii)full-time employment as a principal for at least five of the last seven years immediately precedingbefore the date of the application as a:(A)licensed professional engineer for licensure as a professional engineer;(B)licensed professional structural engineer for licensure as a structural engineer; or(C)licensed professional land surveyor for licensure as a professional land surveyor; and(d)meet with the board or representative of the division upon request for the purpose of evaluating the applicant's qualifications for license.(5)The rules made to implement this section shall be in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.

Section 11:
Section 12.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.